Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.076

[Art. 10] Restraint of persons charged with offenses.

Any person subject to this code charged with an offense under this code shall be ordered into arrest or confinement, as circumstances may require; but when charged only with an offense normally tried by a summary court-martial, such person shall not ordinarily be placed in confinement. When any person subject to this code is placed in arrest or confinement prior to trial, immediate steps shall be taken to inform the person of the specific wrong of which he or she is accused and to try the person or to dismiss the charges and release the person.

[ 1989 c 48 s 10; 1963 c 220 s 10.]